Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1618
Plan sponsor; summary; contents.

A plan sponsor shall provide each covered employee with a copy of a summary of the self-funded portion of the employee benefit plan. The summary shall contain a written description of the major provisions of the self-funded portion of the plan, including (1) a table of contents, (2) a description of benefits, (3) the funding arrangement, and (4) the claims and appeals procedures required by section 13-1623.

Laws 1991, LB 167, § 18.